Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2817.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 41-606, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-606. Action as executor, administrator, guardian or conservator; bond; method of payment A. The department shall post with the secretary of state a corporate surety bond in an amount of five hundred thousand dollars. The bond shall be conditioned upon on the faithful discharge of the department's duties as executor, administrator, conservator or guardian and shall inure to the use and benefit of each person or estate for whom the department is appointed to act. In any case or proceeding in which the department is appointed administrator, executor, guardian or conservator as authorized under this article, the department shall act without additional bond and the court or official having jurisdiction shall so order in its order of appointment. B. In each case in which the department is appointed to serve as administrator, conservator, executor or guardian as authorized under this article, the court in which the estate is filed shall authorize a charge for each estate's share of the bond premium to be paid from the assets of the estate and to be deposited, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, in the state general fund. The department shall determine the charge to be made against each estate. END_STATUTE